Illinois, session 104th, SB432.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nurse Educator Assistance Act is amended by 5changing Section 5-5 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 967/5-5)7    Sec. 5-5. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Nurse Educator Assistance Act.9(Source: P.A. 94-1020, eff. 7-11-06.)